Maine, session 132, LD1190.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Shelter Operating Subsidy 0661
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to support emergency shelters in the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000